California statutes. Insurance Code
10954.

(a) A carrier may use the following characteristics of an eligible child for purposes of establishing the rate of the health benefit plan for that child, where consistent with federal regulations under PPACA: age, geographic region, and family composition, plus the health benefit plan selected by the child or the responsible party for a child.

(b) From the effective date of this chapter to December 31, 2013, inclusive, rates for a child applying for coverage shall be subject to the following limitations:

(1) During any open enrollment period or for late enrollees, the rate for any child due to health status shall not be more than two times the standard risk
 rate for a child.

(2) The rate for a child shall be subject to a 20-percent surcharge above the highest allowable rate on a child applying for coverage who is not a late enrollee and who failed to maintain coverage with any carrier or health care service plan for the 90-day period prior to the date of the child’s application. The surcharge shall apply for the 12-month period following the effective date of the child’s coverage.

(3) If expressly permitted under PPACA and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that act, a carrier may rate a child based on health status during any period other than an open enrollment period if the child is not a late enrollee.

(4) If expressly permitted under PPACA and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that act, a carrier may condition an offer or
 acceptance of coverage on any preexisting condition or other health status-related factor for a period other than an open enrollment period and for a child who is not a late enrollee.

(c) For any individual health benefit plan issued, sold, or renewed prior to December 31, 2013, the carrier shall provide to a child or responsible party for a child a notice that states the following:
“Please consider your options carefully before failing to maintain or renewing coverage for a child for whom you are responsible. If you attempt to obtain new individual coverage for that child, the premium for the same coverage may be higher than the premium you pay now.”
(d) A child who applied for coverage between September 23, 2010, and the end of the initial enrollment
 period shall be deemed to have maintained coverage during that period.

(e) Effective January 1, 2014, except for individual grandfathered health plan coverage, the rate for any child shall be identical to the standard risk rate.

(f) Carriers shall not require documentation from applicants relating to their coverage history.

(g) (1) On and after the operative date of the act adding this subdivision, and until January 1, 2014, a carrier shall provide the model notice, as provided in paragraph (3), to all applicants for coverage under this chapter and to all insureds, or the responsible party for an insured, renewing coverage under this chapter that contains the following information:

(A) Information about the open enrollment period
 provided under Section 10965.3.

(B) An explanation that obtaining coverage during the open enrollment period described in Section 10965.3 will not affect the effective dates of coverage for coverage purchased pursuant to this chapter unless the applicant cancels that coverage.

(C) An explanation that coverage purchased pursuant to this chapter shall be effective as required under subdivision (d) of Section 10951 and that such coverage shall not prevent an applicant from obtaining new coverage during the open enrollment period described in Section 10965.3.

(D) Information about the Medi-Cal program, information about the Healthy Families Program if the Healthy Families Program is accepting enrollment, and information about subsidies available through the California Health Benefit Exchange.

(2) The notice described in paragraph (1) shall be in plain language and 14-point type.

(3) The department shall adopt a uniform model notice to be used by carriers in order to comply with this subdivision, and shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care in adopting that uniform model notice. Use of the model notice shall not require prior approval of the department. The adoption of the model notice by the department for purposes of this section shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 17.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Inoperative, pursuant to Section 10960.5, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10957.

No carrier shall be required to offer a health benefit plan or accept applications for the contract pursuant to this chapter in the case of any of the following:

(a) To a child, if the child who is to be covered by the health benefit plan does not work or reside within the carrier’s approved service areas.

(b) (1) Within a specific service area or portion of a service area, if the carrier reasonably anticipates and demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that it will not have sufficient health care delivery resources to ensure that health care services will be available and accessible to the child because of its obligations
 to existing insureds.

(2) A carrier that cannot offer a health benefit plan to individuals or children because it is lacking in sufficient health care delivery resources within a service area or a portion of a service area may not offer a contract in the area in which the carrier is not offering coverage to individuals to new employer groups until the carrier notifies the commissioner that it has the ability to deliver services to individuals, and certifies to the commissioner that from the date of the notice it will enroll all individuals requesting coverage in that area from the carrier.

(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the commissioner’s authority to develop and implement a plan of rehabilitation for a carrier whose financial viability or organizational and administrative capacity has become impaired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   (AB 2244)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Inoperative, pursuant to Section 10960.5, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10958.

The commissioner may require a carrier to discontinue the offering of contracts or acceptance of applications from any individual or child or responsible party for a child upon a determination by the commissioner that the carrier does not have sufficient financial viability or organizational and administrative capacity to ensure the delivery of health care services to its insureds. In determining whether the conditions of this section have been met, the commissioner shall consider, but not be limited to, the carrier’s compliance with the requirements of this part and the rules adopted under those provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   (AB 2244)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Inoperative, pursuant to Section 10960.5, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10959.

(a) All health benefit plans offered to a child or on behalf of a child to a responsible party for a child shall conform to the requirements of Section 10127.18, 10273.4, and 12682.1, and shall be renewable at the option of the child or responsible party for a child on behalf of the child except as permitted to be canceled, rescinded, or not renewed pursuant to Section 10273.4.

(b) Any carrier that ceases to offer for sale new individual health benefit plans pursuant to Section 10273.4 shall continue to be governed by this chapter with respect to business conducted under this chapter.

(c) Except as authorized under Section 10958, a carrier that as of the
 effective date of this chapter does not write new health benefit plans for children in this state or that after the effective date of this chapter ceases to write new health benefit plans for children in this state shall be prohibited from offering for sale new individual health benefit plans or in this state for a period of five years from the date of notice to the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 191.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Inoperative, pursuant to Section 10960.5, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10960.

On or before July 1, 2011, the commissioner may issue guidance to health plans regarding compliance with this chapter and such guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The guidance shall only be effective until the commissioner and the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care adopt joint regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 192.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Inoperative, pursuant to Section 10960.5, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10960.5.

(a) This chapter shall become inoperative on January 1, 2014, or the 91st calendar day following the adjournment of the 2013–14 First Extraordinary Session, whichever date is later.

(b) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-4), this chapter shall become operative 12 months after the date of that repeal or amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 18.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Note: This section provides for Chapter 9.7 (commencing with Section 10950) to become inoperative on January 1, 2014, and, under certain conditions, to resume operation later.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.9. Individual Access to Health Insurance [10965. - 10965.18.]

10965.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Child” means a child described in Section 22775 of the Government Code and subdivisions (n) to (p), inclusive, of Section 599.500 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) “Dependent” means the spouse or registered domestic partner, child, or parent or stepparent pursuant to Section 10278.1, of an individual, subject to applicable terms of the health benefit plan.

(c) “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange created by Section 100500 of the Government Code.

(d) “Family” means the policyholder and dependent or dependents.

(e) “Grandfathered health plan” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(f) “Health benefit plan” means an individual or group policy of health insurance, as defined in Section 106. The term does not include a health insurance policy that provides excepted benefits, as described in Sections 2722 and 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-21; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-91), subject to Section 10965.01 a health insurance policy provided in the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the Healthy Families Program (Part 6.2 (commencing
 with Section 12693) of Division 2), the Access for Infants and Mothers Program (Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695) of Division 2), or the program under Part 6.4 (commencing with Section 12699.50) of Division 2, or Medicare supplement coverage, to the extent consistent with PPACA or a specified disease or hospital indemnity policy, subject to Section 10965.01.

(g) “Policy year” means the period from January 1 to December 31, inclusive.

(h) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(i) “Preexisting condition provision” means a policy provision that excludes coverage for charges or expenses incurred during a specified period following the insured’s effective date of coverage, as to a condition for which medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received during a specified period immediately preceding the effective date of coverage.

(j) “Rating period” means the calendar year for which premium rates are in effect pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10965.9.

(k) “Registered domestic partner” means a person who has established a domestic partnership as described in Section 297 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 468, Sec. 4.   (AB 570)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.01.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “health benefit plan” does not include policies or certificates of specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity provided that the carrier offering those policies or certificates complies with the following:

(1) The carrier files, on or before March 1 of each year, a certification with the commissioner that contains the statement and information described in paragraph (2).

(2) The certification required in paragraph (1) shall contain the following:

(A) A statement from the carrier certifying that policies or certificates described
 in this section (i) are being offered and marketed as supplemental health insurance and not as a substitute for coverage that provides essential health benefits as defined by the state pursuant to Section 1302 of PPACA, and (ii) the disclosure forms as described in Section 10603 contains the following statement prominently on the first page:
“This is a supplement to health insurance. It is not a substitute for essential health benefits or minimum essential coverage as defined in federal law.”
(B) A summary description of each policy or certificate described in this section, including the average annual premium rates, or range of premium rates in cases where premiums vary by age, gender, or other factors, charged for the policies and certificates issued or delivered in this state.

(3) In the case of a policy or certificate that is described in this section and that is offered in this state on or after January 1, 2014, the carrier files with the commissioner the information and statement required in paragraph (2) at least 30 days prior to the date such a policy or certificate is issued or delivered in this state.

(4) The carrier issuing a policy or certificate of specified disease or a policy or certificate of hospital confinement indemnity requires that the person to be insured is covered by an individual or group policy or contract that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans.

(b) As used in this section, “policies or certificates of specified disease” and “policies or certificates of hospital confinement
 indemnity” mean policies or certificates of insurance sold to an insured to supplement other health insurance coverage as specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 19.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.02.

For the purposes of determining eligibility for small employer coverage, a sole proprietor and the sole proprietor’s spouse are not considered employees with respect to a sole proprietorship that consists only of the sole proprietor and the sole proprietor’s spouse. A partner and a partner’s spouse are not employees of a partnership that consists solely of partners and their spouses. Employer group health benefit plans shall not be issued, marketed, or sold to a sole proprietorship or partnership without employees directly or indirectly through any arrangement. Only individual health benefit plans shall be sold to any entity without employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 700, Sec. 11.   (SB 1375)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.03.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage self-funded student health coverage offered by the University of California Student Health Insurance Plan and the University of California Voluntary Dependent Plan to maintain or exceed coverage standards of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. All other student health coverage offered by an institution of higher education in California shall comply with the provisions of the act that added this subdivision.

(b) For policy years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, a blanket disability insurance policy that meets the definition of student health insurance coverage as set forth in this section shall be considered
 individual health insurance coverage for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 106.

(c) “Student health insurance coverage” is a blanket disability policy under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10270.2, that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, that is provided pursuant to a written agreement between an institution of higher education, as defined in the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, and a disability insurance issuer, and provided to students enrolled in that institution of higher education and their dependents, that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Does not make coverage available other than in connection with enrollment as a student, or as a dependent of a student, in the institution of higher education.

(2) Does not condition eligibility for the insurance coverage on any health status-related factor relating to a student or a dependent of a student.

(3) Does not condition eligibility, an offer, issuance, a sale, or a renewal for the insurance coverage on any factor other than enrollment as a student or dependent of a student in the institution of higher education.

(d) (1) (A) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, a blanket disability insurance policy that meets the definition of student health insurance coverage shall comply with the provisions of this code that are applicable to nongrandfathered individual health insurance, including, but not limited to,
 essential
 health benefits requirements as set forth in Section 10112.27, rating factors consistent with Section 10965.9, the annual limit on maximum out-of-pocket expenses as set forth in Section 10112.28, the prohibition against annual and lifetime limits under Section 10112.1, and all rules and regulations issued thereunder.

(B) Commencing July 1, 2026, if a student certificate holder graduates, takes a leave of absence, or is no longer enrolled at the institution of higher education, they may request to terminate their student health insurance coverage during the policy year. The request shall be provided to the institution of higher education at least 30 calendar
 days before the effective date of termination. Upon receipt of the request to terminate coverage, the institution of higher education shall terminate coverage effective within the same calendar month if feasible, but no later than the last day of the calendar month in which the 30-day period ends. When a student certificate holder, or dependent of a student, chooses to terminate their student health insurance coverage during the policy year consistent with the circumstances set forth under this subparagraph, the student shall only pay the premium through the date of their termination of coverage. A student or dependent of a student shall not be liable for a premium payment during the time that they are not enrolled in student health
 insurance coverage. In the case of premium paid in full for an academic term, the student shall be refunded pro rata for any time they are not enrolled in student health insurance coverage. Notice of the ability to terminate coverage pursuant to this subparagraph shall be provided in the
 student health insurance enrollment materials provided to a student or a dependent of a student. A student or dependent of a student shall also be notified of premium liability to the student or dependent of the student, if any, if a student or dependent of a student chooses not to terminate coverage pursuant to this subparagraph.

(2) Any reference to the insured in a blanket disability insurance policy that meets the definition of student health insurance coverage shall also refer to the individual students and dependents insured under those policies.

(3) For the purposes of applying Sections 10123.81, 10123.84, 10123.87, 10123.135, 10123.194, 10278, 10354, 10965, and 10965.3 to student health insurance coverage, any reference to the policyholder shall also
 refer to the individual students.

(e) (1) A student, or dependent of a student, shall not be required to purchase a blanket disability insurance policy if they have minimum essential coverage that meets the requirements of the Minimum Essential Coverage Individual Mandate under Section 100705 of the Government Code.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2026, a student that obtains or maintains health coverage that is minimum essential coverage and who requests a waiver shall be granted a waiver from obtaining student health insurance coverage from their institution of higher education and shall not be required to pay a fee or premium for student health insurance coverage.

(f) The following provisions apply to student
 health insurance coverage:

(1) Student health insurance coverage is exempt from laws requiring guaranteed availability or guaranteed renewability, as follows:

(A) Subdivision (f) of Section 10273.6 applies if the basis of student health insurance coverage is enrollment in the institution of higher education and an individual’s enrollment in the institution ceases.

(B) For purposes of Sections 10965.3 and 10965.4, a disability insurance issuer that offers student health insurance coverage is not required to accept individuals who are not students or dependents of students in that coverage. Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 10965.3 and Section 10965.4, a disability
 insurance issuer that offers student health insurance coverage is not required to establish open enrollment periods or coverage effective dates that are based on a calendar policy year or to offer policies on a calendar year basis.

(C) For purposes of Sections 10273.6 and 10965.7, a disability insurance issuer that offers student health insurance coverage is not required to renew or continue in force coverage for individuals who are no longer students or dependents of students. To the extent the institution of higher education opts to renew the student health insurance policy, student health insurance coverage shall be renewable with respect to all eligible students or dependents of students at the option of the student.

(2) The requirement to provide a specific level of coverage described
 in Sections 10112.3 and 10112.295 does not apply to student health insurance coverage. However, the benefits provided by that coverage shall provide at least 60 percent actuarial value, as calculated in accordance with Section 10112.295. The issuer shall specify in any plan materials summarizing the terms of the coverage the actuarial value and level of coverage, or the next lowest level of coverage, and how the coverage would otherwise satisfy requirements under Sections 10112.295 and 10112.296.

(3) Student health insurance coverage is not subject to the requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 10965.3. A health insurance issuer that offers student health insurance coverage may establish one or more separate risk pools for an institution of higher education if the distinction between or among groups of students or dependents of students who
 form the risk pool is based on a bona fide school-related classification and not based on a health factor. However, student health insurance rates shall reflect the claims experience of individuals who comprise the risk pool, and any adjustments to rates within a risk pool shall be actuarially justified.

(4) Student health insurance coverage shall not be required to comply with nongrandfathered individual health insurance rate review, but shall be subject to the nongrandfathered large group market rate review requirements under Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 10181) of Chapter 1, with the exception of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10181 and Section 10181.4. If the department determines that a rate is unreasonable or not justified consistent with Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 10181) of Chapter 1, the insurer
 shall notify the policyholder of this decision. If an insurer fails to comply with the timeline specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10181.3, the department may prohibit the proposed rate change.

(5) For purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 10113.9, the notification shall be provided to a student certificate holder in addition to the policyholder. For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 10113.9, the insurer shall provide the notification to the policyholder, and the institution of higher education shall provide the notification of the actual change in premiums to the student certificate holders.

(6) Student health insurance coverage shall be subject to the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 10270.3, Section 10290, paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 10291.5, and Section 10382.

(g) Each of the following shall not apply to student health insurance coverage:

(1) (A) Subdivision (d) of Section 10965.9.

(B) The rating period, instead, is the policy year for which premium rates are established for student health insurance coverage.

(C) The premium rate for student health insurance coverage shall not vary during the rating period.

(2) Sections 2236.1, 2236.3, 2236.4, 2236.5, and 2236.6 of Article 4 of Subchapter 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Subdivision (a) of Section 10270.3.

(4) Subdivision (a) of Section 10144.4.

(5) Subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 10277.

(6) Section 10278 for dependents under 26 years of age.

(7) Subdivisions (g) and (j) of Section 10965.

(8) Subdivisions (a), (c), and (e) of, paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of, and subdivision (h) of, Section 10965.3.

(h) (1) The following notice shall be provided in the student health insurance enrollment
 materials provided to a student or a dependent of a student:
California requires residents and their dependents to obtain, and maintain, health coverage or pay a penalty, unless they qualify for an exemption. Enrolling in student health insurance offered by the college or university you are attending is one way to meet this requirement.

You may be eligible to get free or low-cost health coverage through Medi-Cal regardless of immigration status. In addition, you may be eligible for free or low-cost health coverage through Covered California. Visit Covered California at www.coveredca.com to learn about health coverage options that are available for you and your dependents, and how you might qualify to get financial assistance with the cost of coverage.

If you are under 26 years of age, you may be eligible for coverage as a dependent in a group health plan of your parent’s employer or under your parents’ individual market coverage. In addition, you may be eligible to buy individual health insurance directly from a health insurer or health plan, regardless of immigration status.

Please examine your options carefully to see if other options are more affordable and whether you are currently eligible to enroll in these other forms of coverage pursuant to an open or special enrollment period.
(2) The notice shall be prominently displayed in clear, conspicuous, 14-point bold type.

(3) In addition to the
 enrollment materials, the notice also may be provided on the internet website of the institution of higher education.

(i) (1) A “student administrative health fee” is a fee charged by the institution of higher education on a periodic basis to students of the institution of higher education to offset the cost of providing health care through health clinics regardless of whether the students utilize the health clinics or enroll in student health insurance coverage.

(2) Notwithstanding the requirements under Section 10112.2, a student administrative health fee is not considered a cost-sharing requirement with respect to specified recommended preventive services.

(j) A “health factor” means, in
 relation to an individual, any of the following health status-related factors:

(1) Health status.

(2) Medical condition, including both physical and mental illnesses.

(3) Claims experience.

(4) Receipt of health care.

(5) Medical history.

(6) Genetic information.

(7) Evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence.

(8) Disability.

(9) Any other health status-related factor as determined by any federal regulation, rule, or guidance issued under Section 2705 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-26).

(k) The commissioner may exercise the authority provided by this code and the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement and enforce this section and all sections referenced in
 this section. If the commissioner assesses an administrative penalty for a violation, any hearing that is requested by the insurer may be conducted by an administrative law judge of the administrative hearing bureau of the department under the formal procedure of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. An administrative penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, or, if a violation was willful, shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. This subdivision does not impair or restrict the commissioner’s authority pursuant to another provision of this code or the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   (AB 594)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.1.

Except as provided in Section 10965.15, the provisions of this chapter shall only apply with respect to nongrandfathered individual health benefit plans offered by a health insurer, and shall apply in addition to other provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 19.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.3.

(a) (1) On and after October 1, 2013, a health insurer shall fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell all of the insurer’s health benefit plans that are sold in the individual market for policy years on or after January 1, 2014, to all individuals and dependents in each service area in which the insurer provides or arranges for the provision of health care services. A health insurer shall limit enrollment in individual health benefit plans to open enrollment periods, annual enrollment periods, and special enrollment periods as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(2) A health insurer shall allow the policyholder of an individual health benefit plan to add a
 dependent to the policyholder’s health benefit plan at the option of the policyholder, consistent with the open enrollment, annual enrollment, and special enrollment period requirements in this section.

(b) An individual health benefit plan issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2014, shall not impose any preexisting condition provision upon any individual.

(c) (1) With respect to individual health benefit plans offered outside of the Exchange, a health insurer shall provide an initial open enrollment period from October 1, 2013, to March 31, 2014, inclusive, an annual enrollment period for the policy year beginning on January 1, 2015, from November 15, 2014, to February 15, 2015, inclusive, annual enrollment periods for policy years beginning
 on or after January 1, 2016, to December 31, 2018, inclusive, from November 1, of the preceding calendar year, to January 31 of the benefit year, inclusive, and annual enrollment
 periods for policy years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, from October 15 of the preceding calendar year, to January 15 of the benefit year, inclusive.

(2) With respect to individual health benefit plans offered through the Exchange, a health insurer shall provide an annual enrollment period for the policy years beginning on January 1, 2016, to December 31, 2018, inclusive, from November 1, of the preceding calendar year, to January 31 of the benefit year, inclusive, and annual enrollment periods for policy years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, from November 1 to December 15 of the preceding calendar year, inclusive.

(3) With respect to individual health benefit plans offered through the Exchange, for policy years beginning on or after January 1,
 2019, a health insurer shall provide a special enrollment period for all individuals selecting an individual health benefit
 plan through the Exchange from October 15 to October 31 of the preceding calendar year, inclusive, and from December 16, of the preceding calendar year, to January 15 of the benefit year, inclusive. An application for a health benefit plan submitted during these two special enrollment periods shall be treated the same as an application submitted during the annual open enrollment period. The effective date of coverage for plan selections made between October 15 and October 31, inclusive, shall be January 1 of the benefit year, and for plan selections made from December 16 to January 15, inclusive, shall be no later than February 1 of the benefit year.

(4) Pursuant to Section 147.104(b)(2) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, for individuals enrolled in noncalendar year individual health plan contracts, a health
 insurer shall also provide a limited open enrollment period beginning on the date that is 30 calendar days prior to the date the policy year ends in 2014.

(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), commencing January 1, 2014, a health insurer shall allow an individual to enroll in or change individual health benefit plans as a result of the following triggering events:

(A) The individual or the individual’s dependent loses minimum essential coverage. For purposes of this paragraph, both of the following definitions shall apply:

(i) “Minimum essential coverage” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1345.5 of the Health and Safety Code or subsection (f) of Section 5000A of the Internal
 Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 5000A).

(ii) “Loss of minimum essential coverage” includes, but is not limited to, loss of that coverage due to the circumstances described in Section 54.9801-6(a)(3)(i) to (iii), inclusive, of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the circumstances described in Section 1163 of Title 29 of the United States Code. “Loss of minimum essential coverage” also includes loss of that coverage for a reason that is not due to the fault of the individual.

(iii) “Loss of minimum essential coverage” does not include loss of that coverage due to the individual’s failure to pay premiums on a timely basis or situations allowing for a rescission, subject to clause (ii) and Sections 10119.2 and 10384.17.

(B) The individual gains a dependent or becomes a dependent.

(C) The individual is mandated to be covered as a dependent pursuant to a valid state or federal court order.

(D) The individual has been released from incarceration.

(E) The individual’s health coverage issuer substantially violated a material provision of the health coverage contract.

(F) The individual gains access to new health benefit plans as a result of a permanent move.

(G) The individual was receiving services from a contracting provider under another health benefit plan, as defined in Section 10965 of this code or Section
 1399.845 of the Health and Safety Code, for one of the conditions described in subdivision (a) of Section 10133.56 of this code and that provider is no longer participating in the health benefit plan.

(H) The individual demonstrates to the Exchange, with respect to health benefit plans offered through the Exchange, or to the department, with respect to health benefit plans offered outside the Exchange, that the individual did not enroll in a health benefit plan during the immediately preceding enrollment period available to the individual because the individual was misinformed that the individual was covered under minimum essential coverage.

(I) The individual is a member of the reserve forces of the United States military returning from active duty or a member of the California
 National Guard returning from active duty service under Title 32 of the United States Code.

(J) With respect to individual health benefit plans offered through the Exchange, in addition to the triggering events listed in this paragraph, any other events listed in Section 155.420(d) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) With respect to individual health benefit plans offered outside the Exchange, an individual shall have 60 days from the date of a triggering event identified in paragraph (1) to apply for coverage from a health care service plan subject to this section. With respect to individual health benefit plans offered through the Exchange, an individual shall have 60 days from the date of a triggering event identified in paragraph (1) to select a plan offered through
 the Exchange, unless a longer period is provided in Part 155 (commencing with Section 155.10) of Subchapter B of Subtitle A of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) With respect to individual health benefit plans offered through the Exchange, the effective date of coverage required pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the dates specified in Section 155.410 or 155.420 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as applicable. A dependent who is a registered domestic partner pursuant to Section 297 of the Family Code shall have the same effective date of coverage as a spouse.

(f) With respect to an individual health benefit plan offered outside the Exchange, the following provisions shall apply:

(1) After an individual submits a completed application form for a plan, the insurer shall, within 30 days, notify the individual of the individual’s actual premium charges for that plan established in accordance with Section 10965.9. The individual shall have 30 days in which to exercise the right to buy coverage at the quoted premium charges.

(2) With respect to an individual health benefit plan for which an individual applies during the initial open enrollment period described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), when the policyholder submits a premium payment, based on the quoted premium charges, and that payment is delivered or postmarked, whichever occurs earlier, by December 15, 2013, coverage under the individual health benefit plan shall become effective no later than January 1, 2014. When that payment is delivered